src/noun-rus-morph.txt
! Noun classes
! ============

!We do not ignore stress as it is important 
!for declination of several classes of nouns

! First removing stress info from the lexicon.
! When we start doing stress, we will use this info.



! Masculines
! ----------

! Animates

! We ignore stress
!LEXICON 1ama
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1bma
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1cma
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1dma
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1ema
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1fma
!1ma ;

! We ignore stress for light vowel words
!LEXICON 1xama
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1xbma
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1xcma
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1xdma
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1xema
!1ma ;
!LEXICON 1xfma
!1ma ;


! Inanimates

! We ignore stress
!LEXICON 1ami
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1bmi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1cmi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1dmi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1emi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1fmi
!1mi ;

! We ignore stress for light vowel words
!LEXICON 1xami
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1xbmi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1xcmi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1xdmi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1xemi
!1mi ;
!LEXICON 1xfmi
!1mi ;



! We ignore stress
!LEXICON 2ama
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2bma
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2cma
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2dma
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2ema
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2fma
!2ma ;

! We ignore stress for light vowel words
!LEXICON 2xama
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2xbma
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2xcma
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2xdma
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2xema
!2ma ;
!LEXICON 2xfma
!2ma ;



! We ignore stress
!LEXICON 2ami
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2bmi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2cmi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2dmi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2emi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2fmi
!2mi ;

! We ignore stress for light vowel words
!LEXICON 2xami
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2xbmi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2xcmi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2xdmi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2xemi
!2mi ;
!LEXICON 2xfmi
!2mi ;



LEXICON 3ma                 
1ma ;

LEXICON 3xma
1xma ;

LEXICON 3mi
1mi ;

LEXICON 3xmi
1xmi ;


! Masculine class 4

!LEXICON 4ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 4xma
!1xma ;

!LEXICON 5ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 5xma
!1xma ;

!LEXICON 6ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 6xma
!1xma ;

!LEXICON 7ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 7xma
!1xma ;


!LEXICON 10ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 10xma
!1xma ;

!LEXICON 11ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 11xma
!1xma ;

!LEXICON 12ma
!1ma ;

!LEXICON 12xma
!1xma ;


!LEXICON 4mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 4xmi
!1xmi ;

!LEXICON 5mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 5xmi
!1xmi ;

!LEXICON 6mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 6xmi
!1xmi ;

!LEXICON 7mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 7xmi
!1xmi ;


!LEXICON 10mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 10xmi
!1xmi ;

!LEXICON 11mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 11xmi
!1xmi ;

!LEXICON 12mi
!1mi ;

!LEXICON 12xmi
!1xmi ;




! Feminines, stripping stress


!LEXICON 1afi
!1fi ;


!LEXICON 1xafi
!1xfi ;



! Feminines, 3

!LEXICON 3fa                 
!1fa ;

!LEXICON 3xfa
!1fa ; ! fix

!LEXICON 3fi
!1fi ;

!LEXICON 3xfi
!1xfi ;


! Miscellanious de-stressing lexica

!LEXICON 1xani
!1xni # ;
!LEXICON 2cni
!2ni # ;
!LEXICON 2afa
!2fa # ;
!LEXICON 2afi
!2fi # ;
!LEXICON 2bfi
!2fi # ;
!LEXICON 2efi
!2fi # ;
!LEXICON 2ffi
!2fi # ;
!LEXICON 1afa
!1fa # ;
!LEXICON 1ani
!1ni # ;
!LEXICON 1an
!1n # ;






! Here starts inflection.


! Masculine class 1

LEXICON 1ama
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ов # ;
+N+Msc:           1msuf ;

LEXICON 1xama
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%^LV%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%^LV%>ов # ;
+N+Msc:%^LV           1msuf ;

LEXICON 1ami
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Msc:          1msuf ;

LEXICON 1xami
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%^LV # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%^LV%>ы # ;
+N+Msc:%^LV          1msuf ;

LEXICON 1bmi
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Msc:          1msuf ;

LEXICON 1cmi
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Msc:          1msuf ;

LEXICON 1emi
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Msc:          1msuf ;


! Masculine class 2

LEXICON 2ama
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>я # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:           2msuf ;

LEXICON 2xama
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%^LV%>я # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%^LV%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:%^LV           2msuf ;

LEXICON 2ami
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Msc:          2msuf ;

LEXICON 2xami
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%^LV # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%^LV%>и # ;
+N+Msc:%^LV          2msuf ;

LEXICON 2bmi
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>я # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:           2msuf ;

LEXICON 2cmi
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>я # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:           2msuf ;

LEXICON 2ema
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>я # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:           2msuf ;

LEXICON 2fma
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>я # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:           2msuf ;


! Masculine class 3

! These differ from class 1 only in having
! кгх as final consonant, and in replacing 
! the ы suffix with и. We make a twol rule for
! that, and uify with class 1.


!Masculine class 4

LEXICON 4ama
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:           4msuf ;

LEXICON 4ami
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Msc:          4msuf ;

LEXICON 4bma
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Msc:          4msuf ;

LEXICON 4cma
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ей # ;
+N+Msc:          4msuf ;

LEXICON 4ema
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Msc:          4msuf ;



! Class 5

LEXICON 5ama
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Gen:%>ев # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ев # ;
+N+Msc:          5msuf ;


LEXICON 5ami
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%> # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Gen:%>ев # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Msc:          5msuf ;

LEXICON 5bma
+N+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Gen:%>ов # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Acc:%>ов # ;
+N+Msc:          5msuf ;


! Feminines
! ---------

! Class 1

LEXICON 1afi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Fem:          1fsuf ;

LEXICON 1xafi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%^LV%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Fem:%^LV          1fsuf ;

LEXICON 1afa
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
+N+Fem:          1fsuf ;
           
LEXICON 1xafa
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%^LV%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
+N+Fem:%^LV          1fsuf ;

LEXICON 1bfi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Fem:          1fsuf ;

LEXICON 1dfi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Fem:          1fsuf ;

LEXICON 1ffi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Fem:          1fsuf ;

! Class 2

LEXICON 2afa
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ь # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ь # ;
+N+Fem:          2fsuf ;

LEXICON 2xafa
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%^LV%>ь # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%^LV%>ь # ;
+N+Fem:%^LV          2fsuf ;

LEXICON 2afi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Fem:          2fsuf ;

LEXICON 2xafi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%^LV%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%^LV%> # ;
+N+Fem:%^LV          2fsuf ;

LEXICON 2bfi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Fem:          2fsuf ;

LEXICON 2efi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Fem:          2fsuf ;

LEXICON 2ffi
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Fem:          2fsuf ;



! Feminine class 3

! These differ from class 1 only in having
! кгх as final consonant, and in replacing 
! the ы suffix with и. We make a twol rule for
! that, and uify with class 1.

!Class 4

LEXICON 4afi
+N+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>и ;
+N+Fem:          4fsuf ;

LEXICON 4afa
+N+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
+N+Fem:          4fsuf ;

LEXICON 4bfi
+N+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>и # ;
+N+Msc:          4msuf ;
           

! Class 5

LEXICON 5afa
+N+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
+N+Fem:          5fsuf ;

LEXICON 5afi
+N+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ей # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
+N+Fem:          5fsuf ;

LEXICON 5bfi
+N+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ; 
+N+Fem:          5fsuf ;

! Neuters
! -------

LEXICON 1xn
+N+Neu:%^LV          1nsuf ;

LEXICON 1n
+N+Neu: 1n ;

LEXICON 2n
+N+Neu: 2nsuf ;

LEXICON 2ni
+N+Neu: 2nsuf ; ! fix

LEXICON 3n
+N+Neu: 1nsuf ;

LEXICON 3nko
+N+Neu+Pl+Nom:%>и # ;
+N+Neu: rest_1n_suf ;

LEXICON 4ana
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc:%> # ;
+N+Neu:          4nsuf ;

LEXICON 4ani
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc:%> а # ;
+N+Neu:          4nsuf ;

LEXICON 5ani
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%> е # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%> е # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Ins:%> ем # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc:%> а # ;
+N+Neu:          5nsuf ;

LEXICON 5bni
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%> о # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%> о # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Ins:%> ом # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc:%> а # ;
+N+Neu:          5nsuf ;

LEXICON 5bna
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%> о # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%> о # ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>  # ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Acc:%> а # ;
+N+Neu:          5nsuf ;


! Suffix classes
! ==============

LEXICON 1msuf
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ов # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ;

LEXICON 2msuf
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>я # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>ю # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>и # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ям # ;
             LILPAL ;

LEXICON 4msuf
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>и # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ;

LEXICON 5msuf
+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ;

! Feminines

LEXICON 1fsuf
+Sg+Nom:%>а  # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>ы  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>у  # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>ы  # ;
+Pl+Gen:     # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ;

LEXICON 2fsuf
+Sg+Nom:%>я  # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>и  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>ю  # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ей # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>и  # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ям # ;
             LILPAL ;

LEXICON 4fsuf
+Sg+Nom:%>а  # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>и  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>у  # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>и  # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ;
             


!Neuters

LEXICON 1nsuf
normal_1n_pl_nom ; ! not normal is 3nko
rest_1n_suf ;

LEXICON rest_1n_suf
+Sg+Nom:%>о  # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>а  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>у  # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>о  # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ом # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>   # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
+Pl+Acc:%>а  # ;
             LIL ; 

LEXICON normal_1n_pl_nom
+Pl+Nom:%>а  # ;

LEXICON 2nsuf
+Sg+Nom:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>я  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>ю  # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>я  # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>ей # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ям # ;
+Pl+Acc:%>я  # ;
             LILPAL ; 

LEXICON 4nsuf
+Sg+Nom:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>а  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>у  # ;
+Sg+Acc:%>е  # ;
+Sg+Ins:%>ем # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>а  # ;
+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ; 

LEXICON 5nsuf
+Sg+Gen:%>а  # ;
+Sg+Dat:%>у  # ;
+Pl+Nom:%>а  # ;
+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+Pl+Dat:%>ам # ;
             LIL ; 
                          
LEXICON LIL
+Sg+Loc:%>е   # ;
+Pl+Ins:%>ами # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>ах  # ;

LEXICON LILPAL
+Sg+Loc:%>е   # ;
+Pl+Ins:%>ями # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>ях  # ;
